DI-595

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DIATF-01

DTC

B0 138/72 Short in P/T Squib LH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTCBO 138/72isrecordedwhen aB+ shortis detected inthe P/T squib LH circuit.

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

eFloorNo. 1 wire
e Dashwire (Benchseat)

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
. . o  Seatbeltpretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
¢ Shortin P/T squib LH circuit (to B+) .
. . * Airbag sensorassembly
B0138/72 ¢ P/T squib LH malfunction

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-571.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check seat type.

CHECK:

Confirm that the type of the front seat.

OK:

A: Separate seat
B: Bench seat

L2

Go to step 6.
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3 CHeckfloorNo.

1 wire (P/T squib LH circuit).

@ON FloorNo. 1 Wire

d10

P/T Squib LH

ABO119
H01016 =
|_H08394

11 e

Sensor
:l Assembly

PL+

H08269

@

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM970E)

PREPARATION:

Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait

at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turntheignition switchto ON.

(b) Measurethe voltage between the body ground and PL+
ofthefloorNo. 1 wire connectoronthe seatbelt preten-
sioner LH (P/T squib LH) side.

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

NG% pairorreplacefloorNo. 1 wire.
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4 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Floor No. 1 Wire

C[l EJ:] Airbag
P/T Squib LH :| Sensor
:| Assembly

@@

HO1017
H02139 AB0119
H10600 H01085

DLC3 DTC B0138/72

CG o

H10633

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Usingaservice wire, connect PL+ and PL- of the floor No.
1 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T
squib LH) side.

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:

DTCBO 138/72is notoutput.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 138/72may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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5 | Check P/T squib LH.

P/T Squib LH
CD: :l Airbag
- Sensor
Assembly
: ON
DLC3
A =~
LB
CG TC

H01018
ABO119
H10600 HO1085

DTC B0138/72

H10634

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO0 138/72is notoutput.

HINT:

Codesotherthancode B0 138/72 may be output atthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace seat belt pretensioner LH
(P/T squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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6 [Check P/T squib LH circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery, and wait

PIT Squib LH at least for 2 seconds.
<] B [I airbag CHECK:
] iggg&rbl (@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

{} :| Y (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PL+
of the connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T
ON PL+ squib LH) side between the airbag sensor assembly and

- the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

() (+) OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Go to step 9.

H21545
AB0119
H08394 H21714
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7 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P/T Squib LH
S 1/ 1l ] Airbag
:| Sensor
[g ] Assembly|
PL+ PL- ON
%,

CG

H21549
H02139 AB0119
H10600 H01081

H21715
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PREPARATION:

(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect PL+ and PL- of the connec-
tor on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH) side
between the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt
pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

(e) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTC B0138/72 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0138/72 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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8 |[Check P/T squib LH.
PREPARATION:
P/T Squib LH (@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
< 1] Tl ]Airba (b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
g .
e Sensor tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
]Assembly (c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
connector.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
ON and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
@ (@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
DLC3 DTC B0138/72 (c)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.
(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.
(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
H21547 O_K
S 101081 H21716 DTC B0138/72 is not output.
HINT:

Codes other than code B0138/72 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner LH

(P/T squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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9 [Check floor No. 1 wire.
PREPARATION:
Floor No. 1 Wire ~ Dash Wire (@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
— — (b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
:D ]Airbag tery, wait at least for 90 seconds.
P/T Squib LH ]| sensor (c) Disconnect the floor No. 1 wire connector from the dash
% :| Assembly wire.
ON (d) Connect the negative (-) terminal to the battery, and wait
@ at least for 2 seconds.
PL+ CHECK:
©) ©) (@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PL+
of the floor No. 1wire connector on the seat belt preten-
E]] sioner LH (P/T squib LH) side.
Eé(l)?ﬁg H0839:4 H21717 %

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Repair or replace floor No. 1 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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